Hawaii statutes.
[§514A-88.5] Medical marijuana;
discrimination. A provision in any articles of incorporation, declaration,
bylaws, administrative rules, house rules, association documents, or a similar
document of a condominium property regime allowing for any of the discriminatory
practices listed in paragraphs (1) to (7) of section 515-3 against a person
residing in an apartment who has a valid certificate for the medical use of
marijuana as provided in section 329-123 in any form is void, unless the
document prohibits the smoking of tobacco and the medical marijuana is used by
means of smoking. Nothing herein shall be construed to diminish the obligation
of a condominium property regime to provide reasonable accommodations for
persons with disabilities pursuant to section 515-3(9). [L 2015, c 242, §4]

Cross References

For similar provisions, see §§421J-16 and 514B-113.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next